en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games > Deck Shuffleboard: Deck Shuffleboard Accessories; Deck Shuffleboard Courts; Deck Shuffleboard Cues; Deck Shuffleboard Pucks; Deck Shuffleboard Sets; Deck Shuffleboard Tables
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre > Juegos de tejos: Accesorios para tejo de cubierta; Pistas de tejo de cubierta; Tacos para juegos de tejos; Discos para juegos de tejos; Sets de tejo de cubierta; Mesas de tejo de cubierta
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏 > 甲板沙狐球: 甲板沙狐球配件; 甲板沙狐球场; 甲板沙狐球球杆; 板沙狐球用球; 甲板沙狐球套装; 甲板沙狐球桌
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai > Lauko slidinys: Lauko šaibų stūmimo žaidimo priedai; Denio šaflbordų aikštelės; Lauko slidinio lazdos; Lauko slidinio rituliai; Denio šaflbordų rinkiniai; Denio šaflbordų stalai
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil > Shuffleboard på dæk: Tilbehør til deck shuffleboard; Deck shuffleboard-baner; Køller til shuffleboard; Pucker til shuffleboard; Sæt til deck shuffleboard; Deck shuffleboard-borde
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry > Stolný shuffleboard: Príslušenstvo pre stolový shuffleboard; Kurty na stolný shuffleboard; Tága na stolný shuffleboard; Puky na stolný shuffleboard; Súpravy na stolný shuffleboard; Stoly na stolný shuffleboard
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur > Shuffeboard d'extérieur: Accessoires de shuffleboard; Terrains de shuffleboard; Palettes pour shuffleboard d'extérieur; Palets pour shuffleboard d'extérieur; Ensembles de shuffleboard; Tables de shuffleboard
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre > Shuffleboard de navio: Acessórios para shuffleboard de convés; Quadras de shuffleboard de convés; Tacos para shuffleboard de navio; Discos para shuffleboard de navio; Conjuntos de shuffleboard de convés; Mesas de shuffleboard de convés
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen > Deckshuffleboard: Deckshuffleboardaccessoires; Deckshuffleboardbanen; Cues voor deckshuffleboard; Pucks voor deckshuffleboard; Deckshuffleboardsets; Deckshuffleboardtafels
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе > Шаффлборд на корте: Аксессуары для шаффлборда; Площадки для шаффлборда; Кии для шаффлборда на корте; Шайбы для шаффлборда на корте; Наборы для шаффлборда; Столы для шаффлборда
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム > デッキシャッフルボード: デッキシャッフルボードアクセサリー; デッキシャッフルボードコート; デッキシャッフルボード用キュー; デッキシャッフルボード用ディスク; デッキシャッフルボードセット; デッキシャッフルボードテーブル
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이 > 갑판 셔플보드: 데크 셔플보드 액세서리; 데크 셔플보드 코트; 갑판 셔플보드 큐; 갑판 셔플보드 퍽; 데크 셔플보드 세트; 데크 셔플보드 테이블
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior > Shuffleboard: Acessórios de shuffleboard; Campos de shuffleboard; Tacos de Shuffleboard; Discos de Shuffleboard; Conjuntos de shuffleboard; Mesas de shuffleboard
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto > Shuffleboard da ponte: Accessori da shuffleboard; Campi da shuffleboard; Aste shuffleboard da ponte; Dischi shuffleboard da ponte; Set da shuffleboard; Tavoli da shuffleboard
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit > Pihacurling: Shuffleboard-tarvikkeet; Shuffleboard-kentät; Pihacurling-kepit; Pihacurling-kiekot; Shuffleboard-setit; Shuffleboard-pöydät
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu > Shuffleboard: Akcesoria do shuffleboarda; Boiska do shuffleboarda; Kije do gry w shuffleboard; Krążki do gry w shuffleboard; Zestawy do shuffleboarda; Stoły do shuffleboarda
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları > Deck Shuffleboard: Zemin shuffleboard aksesuarları; Zemin shuffleboard sahaları; Deck Shuffleboard Sopaları; Deck Shuffleboard Topları; Zemin shuffleboard setleri; Shuffleboard masaları
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry > Pozemní shuffleboard: Příslušenství na shuffleboard; Hřiště na shuffleboard; Tága k pozemnímu shuffleboardu; Puky k pozemnímu shuffleboardu; Sady na shuffleboard; Stoly na shuffleboard
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek > Shuffleboard: Tillbehör till däckshuffleboard; Banor för däckshuffleboard; Shuffleboardköer; Shuffleboardpuckar; Däckshuffleboard-set; Bord för däckshuffleboard
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill > Utendørs shuffleboard: Tilbehør til shuffleboard; Baner for shuffleboard; Køer til utendørs shuffleboard; Pucker til utendørs shuffleboard; Sett for shuffleboard; Bord for shuffleboard
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber > Shuffleboard de terasă: Accesorii pentru shuffleboard pe punte; Terenuri de shuffleboard pentru exterior; Bețe pentru shuffleboard de terasă; Pucuri pentru shuffleboard de terasă; Seturi de shuffleboard pentru exterior; Mese de shuffleboard de terasă
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien > Shuffleboard: Shuffleboard-Zubehör; Shuffleboard-Spielfelder; Shuffleboard-Cues; Shuffleboard-Disks; Shuffleboard-Sets; Shuffleboard-Tische
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom > Shuffleboard: Dodaci za shuffleboard; Tereni za shuffleboard; Palice za shuffleboard; Pakovi za shuffleboard; Kompleti za shuffleboard; Stolovi za shuffleboard
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито > Шафълборд на открито: Аксесоари за шафълборд на открито; Игрища за шафълборд на открито; Стикове за шафълборд на открито; Шайби за шафълборд; Комплекти за шафълборд на открито; Маси за шафълборд на открито
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok > Fedélzeti shuffleboard: Shuffleboard kiegészítők; Shuffleboard pályák; Fedélzeti shuffleboard ütők; Fedélzeti shuffleboard-korongok; Shuffleboard készletek; Shuffleboard asztalok
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου > Επιτραπέζιο shuffleboard: Αξεσουάρ deck shuffleboard; Γήπεδα deck shuffleboard; Μπαστούνια shuffleboard; Δίσκοι shuffleboard; Σετ deck shuffleboard; Τραπέζια deck shuffleboard
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง > เกมชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด: อุปกรณ์เสริมชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; สนามชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; ไม้คิวสำหรับเล่นเกมชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; ลูกของกีฬาชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; ชุดชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; โต๊ะชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲 > 甲板沙狐球: 沙狐球配件; 沙狐球場; 甲板沙狐球球桿; 甲板沙狐球球餅; 沙狐球套組; 沙狐球桌
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời > Đẩy đĩa trên sàn: Phụ kiện chơi shuffleboard; Sân chơi shuffleboard; Gậy chơi môn đẩy đĩa trên sàn; Đĩa chơi đẩy đĩa; Bộ chơi shuffleboard; Bàn chơi shuffleboard
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem > Shuffleboard za palube: Dodatki za shuffleboard; Igrišča za shuffleboard za palube; Palice za shuffleboard za palube; Ploščki za shuffleboard za palube; Kompleti za shuffleboard za palube; Mize za shuffleboard za palube